transducers/Even/eve.twol
Alphabet
  a b c d e f g i j k l m n o p r s t u v w x z ŋ č ž š ə ɨ ɵ γ
  %>:0
  a:e a:ə
  ɵ:o ɵ:u
  s:š s:š
  i:i i:ɨ i:ə
  %{w%}:bu %{w%}:m %{w%}:w
  %{n%}:0 %{n%}:n
  %{č%}:č %{č%}:d'i %{č%}:əč %{č%}:n'
  %{l%}:əl %{l%}:l
  %{gič%}:ŋič %{gič%}:gič
  %{gčin%}:ŋčin %{gčin%}:gačin %{gčin%}:gčin
  %{wu%}:w %{wu%}:wu %{wu%}:u %{wu%}:mu %{wu%}:bu %{wu%}:ku
  %{n3sg%}:ni %{n3sg%}:wan %{n3sg%}:n
  %{t%}:ti %{t%}:wun %{t%}:t
  %{wun%}:un %{wun%}:mun %{wun%}:bun %{wun%}:kun %{wun%}:wur %{wun%}:wun
  %{tan%}:wutan %{tan%}:tan
  %{i%}:i %{i%}:j %{i%}:mi %{i%}:bi
  %{wur%}:wur %{wur%}:war %{wur%}:ur %{wur%}:mur %{wur%}:bur
  %{Rpst%}:t %{Rpst%}:s %{Rpst%}:š %{Rpst%}:n %{Rpst%}:č %{Rpst%}:r %{Rpst%}:d
  %{C%}:b %{C%}:d %{C%}:t %{C%}:g %{C%}:m %{C%}:n %{C%}:v %{C%}:č %{C%}:l %{C%}:ŋ
  %{R%}:d %{R%}:t %{R%}:s %{R%}:š %{R%}:0 %{R%}:r
;

Sets
Consonant = b c d f g j k l m n p r s t v w %{w%} x z ŋ č ž š γ;
VoicelessConsonant = f k p s t č š;
aeə = a e ə;
Vowels = a e ə u ɨ ɵ o;

Rules
"d  Voiceless_Consonant _"
d:t => VoicelessConsonant %> _ ;
"{l} (PL) after Consonant"
%{l%}:əl => [Consonant|%{n%}:] %> _ ;
"{l} (PL)r after {n}"
%{l%}:r => %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{w}(ACC) after pl"
%{w%}:bu <=> %{l%}: %> _ ;
"{w}(ACC) after {n}"
%{w%}:m <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{č} (INS) after pl"
%{č%}:d'i <=> %{l%}: %> _ ;
"{č} (INS) after Consonant"
%{č%}:əč <=> Consonant %> _ ;
"{č} (INS) after {n}"
%{č%}:n' <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{gič} (ELAT) after {n}"
%{gič%}:ŋič <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{gčin} (EQU) after {n}"
%{gčin%}:ŋčin <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{gčin} (EQU) after pl"
%{gčin%}:gačin <=> %{l%}: %> _ ;
"{wu}(POSS.1SG) after Consonant"
%{wu%}:u <= [Consonant|%{w%}:] %> _ ;
"{w}(POSS.1SG) after {n}"
%{wu%}:mu <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{wu}(POSS.1SG) after pl"
%{wu%}:bu <=> %{l%}: %> _ ;
"{wu}(POSS.1SG) after dst"
%{wu%}:ku <=> g aeə %> _ ;
"{n3sg}(POSS.3SG) after {n} and pl"
%{n3sg%}:ni <=> [%{n%}:| %{l%}:] %> _ ;
"{n3sg}(POSS.3SG) after ptc.fut"
%{n3sg%}:wan <=> [dŋ|d'iŋ] aeə %> _ ;
"{t}(POSS.1PL.INC) after {n} and pl"
%{t%}:ti <=> [%{n%}:| %{l%}:] %> _ ;
"{t}(POSS.1PL.INC) after ptc.fut"
%{t%}:wun <=> [dŋ|d'iŋ] aeə %> _ ;
"{wun}(POSS.1PL.EXC) after Consonant"
%{wun%}:un <=> [Consonant|%{w%}:] %> _ ;
"{wun}(POSS.1PL.EXC) after {n}"
%{wun%}:mun <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{wun}(POSS.1PL.EXC) after pl"
%{wun%}:bun <=> %{l%}: %> _ ;
"{wun}(POSS.1PL.EXC) after dst"
%{wun%}:kun <=> g aeə %> _ ;
"{wun}(POSS.1PL.EXC) after ptc.fut"
%{wun%}:wur <=> [dŋ|d'iŋ] aeə %> _ ;
"{tan}(POSS.3PL) after ptc.fut"
%{tan%}:wutan <=> [dŋ|d'iŋ] aeə %> _ ;
"{wur}(POSS.REFL.PL) after Consonant"
%{wur%}:ur <= [Consonant|%{w%}:] %> _ ;
"{Rpst} t _ realisation"
%{Rpst%}:t <= t %> _ ;
"{Rpst} č _ realisation"
%{Rpst%}:t <= č %> _ ;
"{Rpst} p _ realisation"
%{Rpst%}:t <= p %> _ ;
"{Rpst} š _ realisation"
%{Rpst%}:š <= š %> _ ;
"{Rpst} n _ realisation"
%{Rpst%}:n => n %> _ ;
"{R} {n} _ realisation"
%{R%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %> _ ;
"{R} _2sg realisation"
%{R%}:0 => _ nni.#.;
"{R} _2pl realisation"
%{R%}:0 => _ š ;
"{R} _3sg realisation"
%{R%}:0 => Vowels %> _ n.#.;
"{R} _3sg realisation"
%{R%}:0 => Vowels %> _ ni.#.;
